Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 63.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-2,147.11
Nebraska
Seed Administrative Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Nebraska Seed
Administrative Cash Fund. All money received pursuant to the Nebraska Seed
Law shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund. All
money credited to the fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture
to aid in defraying the cost of administering such law, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Nebraska Seed Administrative Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 98;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 63.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.